Wyoming, session 2026, SF0062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) Subject to approval of the reorganization plan by
act of the legislature pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, the public funds division of the state department
of audit and all functions of the department of audit
SF0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0165
related to the public funds division shall be transferred
to the legislature not later than July 1, 2027.

(b) The director of the department of audit and the
director of the legislative service office shall jointly
prepare a plan for a Type 2 transfer as provided in W.S.
9-2-1707(b) for the reorganization of the department of
audit by transferring the public funds division of the
department of audit to the legislature. The reorganization
plan shall:

(i) Maintain the current operation of the
department of audit by ensuring the continuing operation of
all divisions and programs other than the public funds
division under the department of audit;

(ii) Require the legislature to perform all
administrative functions currently performed by the public
funds division of the department of audit. The plan may
include recommendations for the structure of a legislative
office of audit or similar entity that would be separate
from the legislative service office;

SF0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0165
(iii) Identify statutory amendments, rule and
procedural amendments and other regulatory amendments
necessary to accomplish the reorganization required by this
section;

(iv) Provide for the transfer of all personnel,
supplies, equipment and appropriations of and for the
public funds division of the department of audit to the
legislative office of audit;

(v) Identify any other issues or factors
relevant to the reorganization required by this section.

(c) The director of the department of audit and the
director of the legislative service office shall submit the
reorganization plan required by subsection (b) of this
section to the governor, management council and the
management audit committee not later than July 1, 2026. The
director of the department of audit and the director of the
legislative service office shall make the plan available to
the public not later than July 1, 2026. Management council
and the management audit committee shall each hold at least
one (1) public hearing regarding the submitted
SF0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0165
reorganization plan before convening of the legislature for
the 2027 general session and may draft appropriate
legislation utilizing the reorganization plan for
introduction during the 2027 general session. It is the
intent of the legislature that any approved reorganization
plan be implemented not later than July 1, 2027.

(d) Unless otherwise directed in a reorganization
plan approved by the legislature under this section, the
duties, powers and functions of the department of audit
shall remain unchanged until July 1, 2027.

Section 2. The validity of rules, regulations,
contracts, amendments or other obligations of the state
department of audit shall not be affected by this act. The
rules and regulations of the department of audit shall
remain in effect until amended or repealed by rules and
regulations adopted by the management council following
approval by the legislature of the reorganization plan
required by this act.

SF0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0165
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0062